North Dakota, session 69, HB1468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH FACILITY GRANT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and improvements fund in
the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $16,000,000, or so much of the sum
as may be necessary, to the department of health and human services for the purpose of
providing a behavioral health facility grant, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027.
2. A grant of up to $16,000,000 must be provided to increase the number of behavioral health
beds in the west central human service center region. To be eligible to receive a grant under
this section, an entity must increase the number of available inpatient behavioral health beds
by thirty.
3. The department shall require an entity receiving a grant under this section to operate the
behavioral health facility for at least ten years and require the grant amount to be repaid if the
entity does not operate the facility for at least ten years. The amount of grant funding that must
be repaid may be reduced by ten percent for each year the facility is in operation. Grant
funding may not be awarded under this section until the physical infrastructure of the
behavioral health facility is complete and the entity submits documentation to the department
to detail adequate staffing plans to support the facility.
4. The requirements of chapter 54-44.4 do not apply to the selection of a grant recipient, the
grant award, or payments made under this section.

H. B. NO. 1468 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1468.
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 6 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 4 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State